Nevada, session 83, AB500.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 55 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 29,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3. “Accumulative investment certificate” means an
investment certificate, not full-paid and without an expressed date
of maturity, upon which the holder has the option of making
payments at such times and in such amounts as the holder elects
and as the payments bank permits.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. “Chargeback” means a transaction that is returned to
a payments bank through a payment card network.
Sec. 5. “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions.
Sec. 6. “Corporate office” means the office of a payments
bank identified as such in the application submitted pursuant to
subsection 4 of section 44 of this act or the location to which the
corporate office is changed pursuant to subsection 13 of section 44
of this act or other applicable law.
Sec. 7. “Deposit” means that part of the liability of a
payments bank which is credited to the account of the holder
thereof and which is eligible to be insured by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or insured by a private insurer in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 8. “Deposit account” means an account that holds
deposits, whether in a commercial, demand, time, checking,
savings or similar type of account, or which is evidenced by a
certificate of deposit, investment certificate, certificate of
indebtedness or other similar name, for which a payments bank is
primarily liable.
Sec. 9. “Depository institution” means any state bank or
payments bank, association, limited-liability company, corporation
or other person organized for the purpose of conducting a banking
business, whether chartered by this State, another state or the
Federal Government, which:
1. Holds or receives deposits, savings or share accounts;
2. Issues certificates of deposit; or
3. Provides to its customers other deposit accounts which are
subject to withdrawal by checks, drafts or other instruments or by
electronic means to effect payment to a third party.
Sec. 10. “Director” means the Director of the Department of
Business and Industry.
Sec. 11. “Division of Financial Institutions” means the
Division of Financial Institutions of the Department of Business
and Industry.
Sec. 12. “Full-paid investment certificate” means an
investment certificate, with or without an expressed date of
maturity, for which the payments bank has received the principal
amount thereof at or prior to the time of the issuance of the
certificate.
Sec. 13. “Insolvency” or “insolvent” means one or more of
the following:
1. When a payments bank cannot meet its deposit liabilities as
they become due in the regular course of business.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 5 –
2. When the actual cash market value of the assets of a
payments bank is insufficient to pay its liabilities to depositors and
other creditors.
3. When the reserves of a payments bank fall under the
amount required by this chapter, and the payments bank fails to
make good such reserve within 30 days after being required to do
so by the Commissioner.
4. When the undivided profits and surplus of a payments
bank are inadequate to cover losses of the payments bank and the
stockholders’ or members’ equity in the payments bank has been
reduced below the requirements of law.
Sec. 14. “Insured depository institution” means a depository
institution, the deposit accounts of which are insured wholly or in
part by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or by a private
insurer in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 15. “Investment certificate” means any certificate or
contract, either paid up or purchasable on an installment basis,
which is issued for the purpose of providing a means of investment
or savings.
Sec. 16. “Leverage capital ratio” means the ratio of the tier 1
capital of a payments bank to the average of the total assets of the
payments bank, not including goodwill, intangible assets and
money ultimately payable to merchants, at the end of each day
during the immediately preceding month.
Sec. 17. “Merchant” means a person authorized by a
payment card network to accept payments in exchange for goods
or services.
Sec. 18. “Merchant acquiring activities” means activities
associated with effecting transactions within payment card
networks, including, without limitation:
1. Obtaining and maintaining membership in one or more
payment card networks;
2. Signing up and underwriting merchants to accept payment
cards branded by a payment card network;
3. Providing the means to authorize valid card transactions at
client merchant locations;
4. Facilitating the clearing and settlement of the transactions
through a payment card network;
5. Providing access to one or more payment card networks to
customers of the payments bank, affiliates of the payments bank
and customers of affiliates of the payments bank;
6. Sponsoring the participation of affiliates of the payments
bank, customers of the payments bank or customers of affiliates of
the payments bank in one or more payment card networks; and
-
*AB500_R1*

– 6 –
7. Conducting such other activities as may be necessary,
convenient or incidental to effecting transactions within payment
card networks.
Sec. 19. “Merger” means the consolidation of corporate
structures which results in the uniting of substantially all the
assets and liabilities of one state-chartered payments bank with
those of another such payments bank or state bank or with those
of a federal bank, national bank or other insured depository
institution.
Sec. 20. “Minimum term investment certificate” means an
investment certificate:
1. For which the payments bank has received a single
payment equal to the principal amount thereof and which has a
date expressed therein before which notice of intention to
withdraw cannot be given or which requires written notice from
the holder to the payments bank for a period specified therein
before the expiration of which period notice of intention to
withdraw cannot be given; and
2. Which, after the date expressed therein or upon and after
the expiration of the specified period following the written notice,
becomes a full-paid investment certificate, subject to the same
withdrawal rights and restrictions as a full-paid investment
certificate.
Sec. 21. “Payments bank” means a depository institution
subject to the provisions of this chapter to conduct the business of
a payments bank.
Sec. 22. “Payment card network” means any organization,
group, system or other collection of persons that is organized to
allow participants to accept or make payments.
Sec. 23. “Payment volume” means the greater of 1/12 of the
total dollar amount of payment transactions:
1. Executed by the payments bank in the immediately
preceding 12 months; or
2. Forecast by the payments bank for the immediately
following 12 months.
Sec. 24. “Payment volume capital” means the amount of tier
1 capital required to be maintained by a payments bank pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 77 of this act.
Sec. 25. “Risk capital” means the amount of tier 1 capital
required to be maintained by a payments bank pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of section 77 of this act.
Sec. 26. “State bank” or “commercial bank” means a
limited-liability company, corporation or other person organized
for the purpose of conducting a banking business that is chartered
-
*AB500_R1*

– 7 –
by this State to conduct the business of banking and is organized
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 659 of NRS.
Sec. 27. “Statutory capital” means the amount of capital
stock and paid-in surplus required to be maintained by a payments
bank pursuant to section 71 of this act.
Sec. 28. “Tier 1 capital” means the sum of statutory capital,
retained earnings, noncumulative perpetual preferred stock, the
secured portion of a guaranty required by section 51 of this act,
and any letter of credit required by section 51 of this act, less any
accounts payable by an affiliate or holding company to the
payments bank, goodwill and intangible assets.
Sec. 29. “Withdrawal value” means the amount credited to a
deposit account, less lawful deductions therefrom, as shown by the
records of the payments bank.
Sec. 30. The Commissioner shall administer the provisions
of this chapter, subject to administrative supervision by the
Director. The Commissioner shall make the decisions,
determinations and enter the consents and orders necessary or
reasonably appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 31. An officer or employee of the Division of Financial
Institutions shall not:
1. Be directly or indirectly interested in or act on behalf of
any payments bank;
2. Receive, directly or indirectly, any payment from a
payments bank;
3. Be indebted to any payments bank; or
4. Obtain any services from a payments bank conditioned
upon a fraudulent practice or undue or unfair preference over
other customers.
Sec. 32. The Commissioner shall:
1. Keep in his or her office:
(a) For not less than 5 years, every report made by a payments
bank.
(b) The original application of every payments bank in a
permanent file.
(c) Other administrative documents in the manner provided by
law or by appropriate regulations.
2. Provide a complete stenographic record of every hearing
and proceeding conducted by his or her office and maintain, for
not less than 5 years, a transcript of the hearing or proceeding,
together with any regulation, order, decision, determination or
consent entered in connection with the hearing or proceeding.
Sec. 33. The Commissioner shall supervise and make all
policy with regard to all foreign and domestic payments banks,
-
*AB500_R1*

– 8 –
companies and corporations governed by this chapter and doing
business in this State.
Sec. 34. The Commissioner shall adopt such regulations as
may be reasonable or necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
Sec. 35. The Commissioner may cause appropriate legal
action to be taken in the district court of any county to secure an
injunction or order restraining a violation of any provision of this
chapter.
Sec. 36. All notices must be in writing. All notices issued or
required to be issued by the Commissioner must be sent by
registered or certified mail and become effective upon their deposit
in the mail.
Sec. 37. The Commissioner may, for reasonable cause and
upon 15 days’ notice, amend or alter any license issued by him or
her, but the payments bank may appeal the order of the
Commissioner in the manner provided in this chapter.
Sec. 38. 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth
in this chapter, each applicant must submit:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Commissioner that the applicant:
(1) Is competent to transact the business for which the
applicant seeks to be licensed in a manner which protects the
interests of the general public.
(2) Has not made a false statement of material fact on the
application for the license.
(3) Has not committed any of the acts specified in
subsection 2.
(4) Has not had a license issued pursuant to this chapter
suspended or revoked within the 10 years immediately preceding
the date of the application.
(5) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony or any crime involving fraud,
misrepresentation or moral turpitude.
(b) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Division of Financial Institutions to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report.
2. In addition to any other lawful reasons, the Commissioner
may refuse to issue a license to an applicant if the applicant:
(a) Has committed or participated in any act which, if
committed or done by a holder of a license, would be grounds for
the suspension or revocation of the license.
(b) Has previously been refused a license pursuant to this
chapter or has had such a license suspended or revoked.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 9 –
(c) Has participated in any act which was a basis for the
refusal or revocation of a license pursuant to this chapter.
(d) Has falsified any of the information submitted to the
Commissioner in support of the application for the license.
Sec. 39. In addition to any other lawful reasons, the
Commissioner may suspend or revoke a license if the licensee has
engaged in any act that would be grounds for denying a license
pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 40. The Commissioner may issue subpoenas and require
the attendance of parties for examination.
Sec. 41. In addition to any other fees required by this
chapter, a payments bank shall pay to the Commissioner a fee
equal to 0.025 percent of each transaction effectuated through the
merchant acquiring activities of the payments bank. All money
received by the Commissioner pursuant to this section must be
deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the State General
Fund.
Sec. 42. Except as otherwise required by the Director
pursuant to NRS 657A.430 or 657A.620, the provisions of this
chapter do not apply to a participant in the Regulatory
Experimentation Program for Product Innovation established and
administered pursuant to chapter 657A of NRS.
Sec. 43. 1. Payments banks must be incorporated under the
provisions of this chapter. For that purpose all of the provisions of
chapter 78 of NRS which are not in conflict with this chapter are
hereby adopted as parts of this chapter, and all the rights,
privileges and powers and all the duties and obligations of such
domestic corporations and of the officers and stockholders thereof
shall be as provided in chapter 78 of NRS except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.
2. A person, firm, partnership, association or corporation
except a payments bank incorporated under this chapter, an
affiliate of a payments bank or an entity otherwise lawfully
conducting business in this State pursuant to this chapter, shall
not conduct or carry on the business of soliciting or advertising
the products or services of a payments bank. This subsection does
not apply to banks, trust companies, licensed brokers, thrift
companies and credit unions.
Sec. 44. 1. The Secretary of State shall not issue a
certificate to a payments bank or company authorizing it to do
business until the articles of association, agreement or
incorporation are approved by the Commissioner.
2. The Secretary of State may not file an amendment to the
articles of the organization without the written approval of the
Commissioner.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 10 –
3. A payments bank shall not sell, offer for sale, negotiate for
the sale of, take subscriptions for or issue any of its common or
preferred stock until it has first applied for and secured from the
Commissioner approval of an application for permission to
organize as provided for in this section.
4. Persons who desire to organize a payments bank in
accordance with this chapter must first execute in triplicate an
application, in the form prescribed by the Commissioner, for
permission to organize a payments bank before taking any other
action in connection with the organization. Upon execution of an
application for permission to organize, the original application
and two copies of the application must be submitted to the
Commissioner. The applicants shall submit with the application
the name and address of each person who is applying, the location
of the proposed corporate office, an itemized account of the
financial condition of the proposed payments bank and of the
applicants, the amount and character of the proposed stock,
statements, exhibits, maps and such additional information as the
Commissioner requires, together with an affidavit that the
representations made thereby are consistent with the facts to
the best of the applicants’ information and belief. This data must
be sufficiently detailed and comprehensive to enable the
Commissioner to pass upon the application as to:
(a) The character and responsibility of the applicants; and
(b) The reasonable probability of the usefulness and success of
the payments bank.
5. If the Commissioner approves the application, he or she
shall establish as conditions to be met before the issuance of a
charter requirements as to:
(a) The minimum number of shares of common or preferred
stock to be subscribed to the permanent capital of the payments
bank;
(b) The minimum amount of paid-in surplus;
(c) The minimum amount of investment certificates to be paid
into the deposit accounts of the payments bank upon issuance of a
charter to the payments bank; and
(d) Such other requirements as the Commissioner deems
necessary or desirable.
6. When all the requirements of this chapter and of the
Commissioner have been fulfilled, the Commissioner shall issue a
charter for the payments bank. Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, the charter expires 12 months after issuance
unless, within that time, the payments bank is actively engaging in
the business of a payments bank. The Commissioner may extend
the time of the conditional expiration of the charter if the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 11 –
payments bank submits to the Commissioner a request containing
any information required by the Commissioner by regulation and
a fee in an amount established by the Commissioner by regulation.
7. A payments bank shall not sell or issue any of its
permanent stock until it has first applied for and secured from the
Commissioner a license authorizing it to operate as a payments
bank pursuant to the laws of this State and until it has satisfied the
requirements of this chapter.
8. The Commissioner may extend the time for any hearing
provided for in this section, to the time agreed upon by the parties.
9. The filing fees are:
(a) For filing an original application, not more than $50,000
for the corporate office. The applicant shall also pay such
additional expenses incurred in the process of investigation as
the Commissioner deems necessary. All money received by the
Commissioner pursuant to this paragraph must be placed in the
Investigative Account for Financial Institutions created by
NRS 232.545.
(b) If the license is approved for issuance, not more than
$10,000 for the corporate office before issuance.
10. The Commissioner may impose conditions requiring the
impoundment of proceeds from the sale of any stock, limiting the
expense in connection with the sale of stock and such other
conditions as are reasonable and necessary or advisable to insure
the disposition of the proceeds from the sale of the stock in the
manner and for the purposes provided in the permission to
organize.
11. Every permission to organize issued by the Commissioner
must recite in bold type that its issuance is permissive only and
does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the
organization or of the stock permitted to be issued.
12. Any corporation applying pursuant to this section or
authorized to organize or establish a payments bank shall provide
for a minimum par value of its permanent capital stock of at least
$1 in its articles of incorporation. Par value of permanent capital
stock may not be reduced below $1 without written permission of
the Commissioner.
13. The removal of the corporate office of a payments bank to
any other location from its then existing location requires
submission of written notice at least 30 days before relocation to
the Commissioner and, if the Commissioner determines that his or
her approval is necessary, approval of the Commissioner. An
application seeking approval, if required by the Commissioner,
must be delivered to the Commissioner, together with a fee to
cover expenses attendant upon the investigation required for the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 12 –
approval, which must be not less than $200. All money received by
the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection must be placed in
the Investigative Account for Financial Institutions created by
NRS 232.545.
14. A payments bank shall not pay any commissions or other
compensation for the subscription to or sale of the original issue
of its stock.
15. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing
the amount of fees required pursuant to this section.
16. The Commissioner shall consider an application to be
withdrawn if the Commissioner has not received all information
and fees required to complete the application within 12 months
after the date the application is first submitted to the
Commissioner or within such later period as the Commissioner
determines in accordance with any existing policies of joint
regulatory partners. If an application is deemed to be withdrawn
pursuant to this subsection or if the applicant otherwise withdraws
the application, the Commissioner may not issue a license to the
applicant unless the applicant submits a new application and pays
any required fees.
Sec. 44.5. 1. The Secretary of State may apply for and be
issued a license to operate a payments bank.
2. A payments bank operated by the Secretary of State may
provide services only to governmental entities, including, without
limitation, the State of Nevada, any political subdivision of the
State of Nevada and any other state, local or tribal governmental
entity.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a payments
bank operated by the Secretary of State shall operate in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
4. The Commissioner may, by regulation, waive or modify
any requirement set forth in this chapter that the Commissioner
determines is not appropriate for a payments bank operated by the
Secretary of State.
Sec. 45. The powers, privileges, duties and restrictions
conferred and imposed upon any payments bank, company or
corporation, whether foreign or domestic, existing or doing
business under the laws of this State are hereby abridged,
enlarged or modified, as each particular case may require, to
conform with the provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in their respective articles of
incorporation or charters.
Sec. 46. Before a payments bank begins business, the
payments bank must file with the Commissioner:
-
*AB500_R1*

– 13 –
1. A statement, under oath by the president or a manager,
containing the names of all the directors, managers and officers,
with the date of their election or appointment, terms of office,
primary residence and post office address of each, the amount of
stock of which each is the owner in good faith and the amount of
money paid in on account of the stock, or the contribution made.
Nothing may be received in payment of stock or contribution
except money.
2. Proof that:
(a) The payments bank has the approval of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation to insure its deposit accounts;
(b) The Commissioner has approved the application of the
payments bank submitted pursuant to section 47 of this act to
operate without insurance of its deposit accounts and complied
with the provisions of section 49 of this act; or
(c) The Commissioner and the Commissioner of Insurance
have approved the application of the payments bank submitted
pursuant to section 47 of this act to insure its deposit accounts
under a contract issued by a private insurer.
Sec. 47. If the deposit accounts of the payments bank will not
be insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the
payments bank must submit to the Commissioner an application
for approval to:
1. Operate without insurance of the deposit accounts of the
payments bank; or
2. Insure the deposit accounts of the payments bank under a
contract with a private insurer approved by the Commissioner and
the Commissioner of Insurance.
Sec. 48. 1. In determining whether a private insurer may
issue a contract to insure the deposit accounts of a payments bank,
the Commissioner and the Commissioner of Insurance must
consider:
(a) The value of the insurer’s capital.
(b) The ratio of the insurer’s assets, including, without
limitation, reinsurance, which are readily available to cover any
losses incurred by depositors to its insured deposits. This ratio
must be adequate to reimburse depositors for any losses which
they may incur.
(c) The qualifications of the directors, officers and managers
of the insurance company.
(d) The insurer’s articles of incorporation and its bylaws and
all amendments thereto.
(e) The insurer’s policies for investments.
(f) The form of all insurance contracts entered into by the
insurer, including, without limitation, contracts for reinsurance.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 14 –
(g) The insurer’s requirements for premiums or deposits.
(h) The insurer’s policies for the management of risk.
(i) Such other considerations as the Commissioner prescribes
by regulations adopted pursuant to section 34 of this act.
2. The Commissioner and the Commissioner of Insurance
shall not approve a contract of insurance unless the protection
afforded thereby to the depositors is substantially equivalent to the
amount required by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
3. After a private insurer obtains the approval of the
Commissioner and the Commissioner of Insurance, the
Commissioner, after consultation with the Commissioner of
Insurance may, for cause, require the insurer to establish and
maintain for such a time as the Commissioner may require, a
reserve, in cash or United States treasury bills or notes, in an
amount fixed by the Commissioner. If required, the reserve must
be kept in an account approved by the Commissioner in a federally
insured financial institution.
4. A private insurer who issues a contract to insure the
deposit accounts of a payments bank does not engage in the
business of insurance of the purposes of title 57 of NRS.
Sec. 49. 1. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 2, if
the Commissioner approves the application of a payments bank to
operate without insurance of its deposit accounts submitted
pursuant to section 47 of this act, the payments bank must, before
transacting any business, furnish a surety bond to the
Commissioner to cover costs likely to be incurred by the
Commissioner in a liquidation or conservatorship of the payments
bank pursuant to NRS 658.151. The bond must:
(a) Be in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner;
(b) Be issued by a bonding company authorized to do business
in this State; and
(c) Secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the
payments bank.
2. In lieu of a bond required by subsection 1, a payments
bank may irrevocably pledge specified assets equivalent to a bond
under subsection 1. All costs associated with pledging and holding
the assets are the responsibility of the payments bank. Any assets
pledged pursuant to this subsection must:
(a) Be unencumbered;
(b) Not serve as collateral for any other purpose; and
(c) Be of the same nature and quality as the assets described in
NRS 671.110.
3. The amount of the surety bond or pledge of assets required
pursuant to this section must be determined by the Commissioner
-
*AB500_R1*

– 15 –
in an amount sufficient to defray the costs of a liquidation or
conservatorship.
4. In the event of a liquidation or conservatorship of a
payments bank, the Commissioner may, without regard to
priorities, preferences or adverse claims, reduce the surety bond or
assets pledged pursuant to this section to cash as soon as
practicable and use the cash to defray the costs associated with the
liquidation or conservatorship.
5. Whenever the Commissioner determines that the protection
of the public so requires, the Commissioner may order that an
increase be made in the principal sum of the bond of any
payments bank.
6. A payments bank or the surety of the payments bank may
not cancel or alter a bond required pursuant to this section except
after providing notice to the Commissioner by registered or
certified mail. The cancellation or alteration is not effective until
10 days after receipt of the notice by the Commissioner. A
cancellation or alteration does not affect any liability incurred or
accrued on the bond before the cancellation or alteration.
Sec. 50. 1. A payments bank shall maintain bond coverage
in such amounts and form as are acceptable to the Commissioner.
The bond coverage may allow for a deductible amount or
provision adopted under regulations adopted by the
Commissioner.
2. When requested by the Commissioner, the payments bank
shall provide a duplicate copy of the invoice showing that the bond
premium has been paid or satisfied.
3. The face amount of the surety bond must comply with the
requirements adopted by the Commissioner.
Sec. 51. 1. The Commissioner may require a payments
bank to provide to the Commissioner an irrevocable letter of credit
made payable to the Commissioner for the benefit of merchants in
the event of the bankruptcy, receivership or insolvency of the
payments bank. Any letter of credit required pursuant to this
section must be:
(a) In a form satisfactory to the Commissioner;
(b) For a term of not less than 1 year; and
(c) Issued by a financial institution that is approved by the
Commissioner.
2. The Commissioner may require a holding company of a
payments bank to provide to the Commissioner an unlimited,
unconditional and continuous guaranty by the holding company
to maintain in the payments bank at least the minimum levels of
capital required by the provisions of this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Commissioner may
-
*AB500_R1*

– 16 –
require any portion of the guaranty to be secured by collateral of a
type approved by the Commissioner.
Sec. 52. 1. In addition to the corporate office, a payments
bank organized under this chapter may establish and maintain
one or more other offices within this State.
2. A payments bank shall notify the Commissioner in writing
of any change to the location of any office established and
maintained pursuant to subsection 1 not later than 30 days after
the change of location.
Sec. 53. 1. A payments bank shall not issue or publish, or
cause or permit to be issued or published, any advertisement that it
is doing or is permitted to do any business which is prohibited by
law for a payments bank, or which misrepresents the nature of its
stock, investment certificates, payments deposits or the right of
investors or depositors in respect thereto.
2. A payments bank may set forth in any of its advertisements
any of the purposes for which it is organized.
3. A payments bank shall not issue, circulate or publish any
advertisement after notice in writing from the Commissioner that
in his or her opinion the advertisement is unauthorized, false,
misleading or likely to deceive the public.
4. A payments bank shall not:
(a) State in any advertisement that it is under state supervision
or control.
(b) Include in any advertisement or in any instrument used by
it a replica of the Great Seal of the State of Nevada.
(c) Use the word “deposit” or “deposits” in any form of
advertising that would be prohibited under federal law.
Sec. 54. 1. A licensee must obtain the approval of the
Commissioner before using or changing a business name.
2. A licensee shall not:
(a) Use any business name which is identical or similar to a
business name used by another licensee under this chapter which
may mislead or confuse the public.
(b) Use any printed forms which may mislead or confuse the
public.
Sec. 55. 1. The business and affairs of every payments
bank must be managed and controlled by a board of not less than
5 and not more than 25 directors, a majority of which must not be
full-time officers of the payments bank. The persons designated in
the articles of incorporation are the first directors.
2. Vacancies in the board of directors must be filled by vote of
the stockholders at the annual meetings or at a special meeting
called for that purpose. The board of directors may fill vacancies
-
*AB500_R1*

– 17 –
occurring on the board and such appointees serve until the next
annual meeting of the stockholders.
3. The board of directors of a payments bank may amend the
bylaws of the payments bank.
Sec. 56. A person is not eligible to serve as a director of a
payments bank without the written permission of the
Commissioner if he or she:
1. Has been adjudicated bankrupt or has taken the benefit of
any assignment for the benefit of creditors or has suffered a
judgment recovered against him or her for a sum of money to
remain unsatisfied of record or not safeguarded by a supersedeas
bond on appeal for a period of more than 3 months.
2. Is a director, officer or employee of any other unaffiliated
payments bank.
3. Is an officer or employee of an unaffiliated commercial
bank in this State.
4. Is not an investor in the payments bank or its holding
company, if applicable, owning in his or her own right or in a
representative capacity as an executor, administrator, guardian or
trustee stock in the payments bank or its holding company, if
applicable, of the par value of at least $1,000, or full-paid
investment certificates in the payments bank or its holding
company, if applicable, of the value of at least $1,000. For the
purpose of this chapter, a person who owns stock or investment
certificates as a joint tenant with one other person shall be deemed
to own, in his or her own right, one-half of the stock or investment
certificates.
5. Sells or hypothecates all the stock or investment certificates
owned by him or her, or so much thereof that he or she ceases to
be the owner, free from encumbrances, of the amount of stock or
investment certificates required by subsection 4.
Sec. 57. If the Commissioner notifies the board of directors
of any payments bank, in writing, that he or she has information
that any director, officer or employee of the payments bank is
failing in the performance of his or her duties, the board of
directors shall meet and consider the matter forthwith. The
Commissioner must have notice of the time and place of the
meeting. If the board of directors finds the Commissioner’s
objection to be well founded, the director, officer or employee shall
be removed immediately.
Sec. 58. 1. Any director may be removed from office, if he
or she has become ineligible pursuant to section 56 of this act, by
an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board of
directors at any regular meeting of the board of directors or at any
-
*AB500_R1*

– 18 –
special meeting called for that purpose. Such action shall be
ratified at the next meeting of the stockholders.
2. No such vote upon removal of the director may be taken
until he or she has been advised of the reasons thereto, either oral
or written. If the director affected is present at the meeting, he or
she shall retire after his or her statement has been submitted and
before the vote upon the matter of his or her removal.
Sec. 59. Directors and officers of a payments bank shall
discharge the duties of their respective positions in good faith and
with the diligence, care and skill which ordinary, prudent persons
would exercise under similar circumstances in a similar position.
Sec. 60. The board of directors of a payments bank shall
elect the officers named in the bylaws of the payments bank, which
officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.
Sec. 61. 1. The board of directors of each payments bank
shall hold a regular meeting at least once each quarter, at a time
to be designated by it in accordance with its bylaws.
2. Special meetings of the board of directors may be held
upon notice to each director sufficient to permit his or her
attendance. The president or any three members of the board of
directors may call a meeting of the board of directors by giving
notice to all of the directors.
3. At any meeting of the board of directors, a majority of the
members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
Sec. 62. Every official communication by the Commissioner
directed to the board of directors of a payments bank must be
presented at the next meeting of the board of directors and made a
part of the minutes of the meeting.
Sec. 63. 1. A payments bank shall immediately notify the
Commissioner of any change or proposed change in ownership of
the stock of the payments bank which would result in any person,
including, without limitation, a business trust, obtaining 5 percent
or more of the outstanding capital stock of the payments bank.
2. An application must be submitted to the Commissioner,
pursuant to section 44 of this act, by a person who acquires:
(a) At least 25 percent of the outstanding stock of the payments
bank; or
(b) Any outstanding stock of a payments bank if the change
will result in a change in the control of the payments bank.
 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the Commissioner
shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the character
and responsibility of the applicant is such as to command
the confidence of the community in which the corporate office of
the payments bank is located. If the Commissioner denies the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 19 –
application, he or she may forbid the applicant from participating
in the business of the payments bank.
3. The payments bank with which the applicant is affiliated
shall pay such a portion of the cost of the investigation as the
Commissioner requires. All money received by the Commissioner
pursuant to this section must be placed in the Investigative
Account for Financial Institutions created by NRS 232.545.
4. A payments bank may submit a written request to the
Commissioner to waive an investigation pursuant to subsection 2.
The Commissioner may grant a waiver if the applicant has
undergone a similar investigation by a state or federal agency in
connection with the licensing of or his or her employment with a
financial institution.
Sec. 64. A payments bank may provide for pensions,
retirement plans and other benefits for its officers and employees,
and may contribute to the cost thereof in accordance with the plan
adopted by its board of directors.
Sec. 65. The board of directors shall approve the depositary
or depositaries for funds of the payments bank.
Sec. 66. 1. It is unlawful for an officer, director, employee
or capital stockholder of a payments bank to:
(a) Solicit, accept or agree to accept, directly or indirectly,
from any person other than the payments bank or an affiliate of
the payments bank, any gratuity, compensation or other personal
benefit for any action taken by the payments bank or for
endeavoring to procure any such action.
(b) Have any interest, direct or indirect, in the purchase at less
than its face value of any evidence of a deposit account or other
indebtedness issued by the payments bank, excluding stock
certificates and junior capital notes.
2. A violation of the provisions of this section is a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 67. Any director or officer of a payments bank or any
other person who knowingly and willingly participates in any
violation of the laws of this State relative to payments banks is
liable for all damage which the payments bank, its stockholders,
payments depositors or creditors sustain in consequence of such
violation.
Sec. 68. Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of a
payments bank to indemnify and defend, or to provide
reimbursement for expenses of defending an action to, officers,
directors, employees, agents or other parties as such authority may
be provided under the laws of this State, if such indemnification
does not violate the limitations on indemnification imposed by
section 18(k) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. §
-
*AB500_R1*

– 20 –
1828(k), and the regulations adopted by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation pursuant thereto.
Sec. 69. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
every payments bank licensed under the provisions of this chapter
has the same rights, powers, privileges, immunities and exceptions
which are possessed by any federal banks, including, without
limitation, all such fiduciary powers that a federal bank is
authorized to exercise except as may be expressly denied or limited
by the Commissioner after notice and a hearing.
2. If federal law conflicts with any of the provisions of this
chapter, except as otherwise provided by the Commissioner, the
provisions of federal law shall prevail as to such conflict, and
satisfaction of any obligations imposed under federal law by the
payments bank shall be deemed to also satisfy the obligations of
the payments bank under state law.
3. In addition to all other powers otherwise granted by this
chapter, every payments bank licensed under the provisions of this
chapter has the powers, privileges and authorities granted by
regulations promulgated under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act
for foreign banks, except as may be expressly denied or limited by
the Commissioner after notice and a hearing.
4. A payments bank shall have any power reasonably
incident, convenient or useful to the accomplishment of the
powers conferred upon the payments bank by this chapter.
Sec. 70. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in
addition to all powers, express or implied, that a payments bank
has under this chapter, a payments bank has the powers, privileges
and authorities that a state bank has under chapters 657 to 671,
inclusive, of NRS and that a national bank has. Such powers,
privileges and authorities include, without limitation, the
conducting of merchant acquiring activities, money transmission,
as defined in NRS 671.013, and activities concerning the
maintenance of deposit accounts.
2. A payments bank shall not engage in any activity:
(a) Described in NRS 673.324 to 673.332, inclusive, relating to
loans; or
(b) That the Commissioner has, after notice and a hearing,
expressly denied or limited.
3. A payments bank may apply to receive deposit insurance
from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or its successor
agency.
4. Any restriction, limitation or requirement applicable to a
specific power, privilege or authority of a state bank or national
bank applies to a payments bank exercising such a power,
-
*AB500_R1*

– 21 –
privilege or authority pursuant to this section to the extent that a
payments bank exercises such a power, privilege or authority.
Sec. 71. A payments bank shall at all times maintain capital
stock and paid-in surplus as required by the Commissioner, but in
no event in an amount that is less than the lesser of $3,000,000 or
an amount determined by the Commissioner after his or her
review of the application for permission to organize as a payments
bank.
Sec. 72. 1. Any payments bank licensed pursuant to this
chapter may subscribe to the stock of a Federal Reserve Bank and
become a member of the Federal Reserve System.
2. Any payments bank licensed pursuant to this chapter
which is, or which becomes, a member bank is, by this section,
vested with all powers conferred upon member banks of the
Federal Reserve System by the terms of the Federal Reserve Act as
fully and completely as if such powers were specifically
enumerated and described in this section, and all such powers
must be exercised subject to all restrictions and limitations
imposed by the Federal Reserve Act, or by regulations of the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System made pursuant
thereto. The right, however, is expressly reserved to revoke or to
amend the powers conferred in this section.
3. Compliance on the part of any such payments bank with
the reserve requirements of the Federal Reserve Act shall be
deemed to be full compliance with those provisions of the laws of
this State which require payments banks to maintain cash
balances in their vaults or with other banks, and no such
payments bank need carry or maintain a reserve other than such
as is required under the terms of the Federal Reserve Act.
4. The authorities of this State having supervision over such
payments bank may disclose to the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System, or to examiners appointed by it, all
information in reference to the affairs of any payments bank
which has become, or desires to become, a member bank of the
Federal Reserve System.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
limit the ability of a payments bank to engage in any activity
authorized by this chapter.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System”
means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System
created and described in the Federal Reserve Act.
(b) “Federal Reserve Act” means the Act of Congress,
approved December 23, 1913, being c. 6, 38 Stat. 251, as amended.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 22 –
(c) “Federal Reserve Bank” means the Federal Reserve Banks
created and organized under authority of the Federal Reserve Act.
(d) “Federal Reserve System” means, collectively, the Federal
Reserve Banks and the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve
System.
(e) “Member bank” means any national bank, state bank,
payments bank or banking and trust company which has become
or which becomes a member of the Federal Reserve System.
Sec. 73. A payments bank may purchase or lease property for
its office buildings or construct its office buildings on property
purchased or leased by it, if the total cost of land and
improvements does not exceed 70 percent of the sum of the capital,
surplus and reserves of the payments bank.
Sec. 74. 1. A payments bank shall not sell or issue any of
its common or preferred stock until it has first applied for and
secured from the Commissioner a license authorizing it so to do as
provided in section 44 of this act.
2. Every license must recite in bold type that the issuance of
the license is permissive only and does not constitute a
recommendation or endorsement of the stock permitted to be
issued.
3. Before the sale of, or option to buy, any additional
authorized but unissued common or preferred stock, the payments
bank must have the written approval of the Commissioner.
4. The Commissioner may impose conditions requiring the
impoundment of the proceeds from the sale of any stock, limiting
the expense in connection with the sale and such other conditions
as are reasonable and necessary or advisable to ensure the
disposition of the proceeds from the sale of the stock in the
manner and for the purposes provided in the license.
Sec. 75. 1. The license specified in section 74 of this act
authorizes the company, payments bank or corporation to whom it
is issued to sell its approved securities and contracts within this
State for the remainder of the fiscal year ending on June 30 next
succeeding. Each license is renewable, under like restrictions,
annually thereafter.
2. For the issuing of any license provided for in section 74 of
this act and for any renewal thereof, the fee of the Commissioner
is $400.
3. The fees must accompany the license renewal application.
A penalty of 10 percent of the fee payable must be charged for
each month or part thereof that the fees are not paid after June 30
of each year.
4. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing the
amount of the fees required pursuant to this section.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 23 –
Sec. 76. 1. A payments bank may issue investment
certificates, with or without passbooks. The holders of investment
certificates are not liable for debts or assessments, and are entitled
upon liquidation of a payments bank to receive payment in full
before any payment or distribution is made to stockholders. The
holders of investment certificates have no right to participate in
the profits of the payments bank.
2. Investment certificates may be issued as fully paid
investment certificates, accumulative investment certificates,
minimum term investment certificates or other types of certificates
approved by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not
approve any certificates whose issuance would impair the
insurance of the accounts of the payments bank by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation, if applicable.
Sec. 77. 1. A payments bank shall continuously maintain:
(a) A leverage capital ratio of not less than 10 percent;
(b) The following amount of payment volume capital:
(1) Five percent of payment volume for payment volume
that does not exceed $10,000,000;
(2) An additional 3 percent of payment volume for payment
volume that exceeds $10,000,000 but does not exceed $25,000,000;
(3) An additional 1.5 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $25,000,000 but does not exceed
$100,000,000;
(4) An additional 0.75 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $100,000,000 but does not exceed
$250,000,000;
(5) An additional 0.25 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $250,000,000 but does not exceed $1
billion;
(6) An additional 0.15 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $1 billion but does not exceed $5
billion;
(7) An additional 0.08 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $5 billion but does not exceed $20
billion; and
(8) An additional 0.05 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $20 billion;
(c) An amount of risk capital that is not less than the greater
of:
(1) An amount that is two times the average monthly
chargebacks in the immediately preceding 6 months; or
(2) An amount that is two times the average monthly
forecast dollar volume of chargebacks for a 6-month period; and
-
*AB500_R1*

– 24 –
(d) The amount of capital stock and paid-in surplus required
by section 71 of this act.
2. The Commissioner may determine that a payments bank
that, at any time, has less than the minimum leverage capital ratio,
payment volume capital, risk capital or statutory capital required
by subsection 1 is operating in an unsafe or injurious manner.
Such a payments bank shall comply with any order or action taken
by the Commissioner to restore the payments bank to adequate
capitalization.
Sec. 78. Deposits received by a payments bank may only be
invested in:
1. High-quality liquid assets, as defined in 12 C.F.R. § 329.3.
2. Demand, time or payments deposits with any bank, credit
union or trust company whose deposits are insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share
Insurance Fund or a private insurer approved pursuant to
NRS 672.755.
3. Stock or obligations of any corporation or agency of the
United States or any state, or in deposits therewith to the extent
that such a corporation or agency assists in furthering or
facilitating the purposes or powers of the payments bank.
4. Deposit accounts of any insured depository institution
licensed by this State and of any federally chartered depository
institution, if the accounts of such institution are insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
Sec. 79. 1. A payments bank may invest the equity of the
payments bank in capital stock, obligations or other securities of a
related service company, operating subsidiary or financial
subsidiary.
2. The investments in subsection 1 shall not include any
money deposited to the payments bank by a third party.
Sec. 80. The power of a payments bank to borrow money and
contract debts includes the power to issue capital notes evidencing
such borrowings and to subordinate the same to investment
certificates and other liabilities.
Sec. 81. The aggregate amount of all borrowings of any
payments bank must not exceed an amount which would impair
the insurance of the deposit accounts of the payments bank, if any.
Sec. 82. 1. Any payments bank may issue deposit accounts
or investment certificates to minors with the written consent of
their parents, trustees or guardians, and to married persons, each
in their own right.
2. Any payment thereon, or delivery thereof, or of any rights
thereunder, to a minor of the age of 14 years or over, or to a
married person, or a receipt or acquittance signed by the minor
-
*AB500_R1*

– 25 –
and parent, trustee or guardian or by a married person who holds
such deposit accounts or investment certificates, is a valid and
sufficient release and discharge of the payments bank for any
such payment or delivery.
Sec. 83. 1. A deposit account or investment certificate of
any payments bank may be purchased and held by any person as
administrator, executor, guardian, or as trustee or other fiduciary,
in trust for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries.
2. Any person holding a deposit account as a fiduciary may
make payments upon, and withdraw, in whole or in part, the
deposit account or investment certificate.
3. The withdrawal value of any such deposit account or
investment certificate and interest thereon, or other rights relating
thereto, may be paid or delivered to the fiduciary, and the payment
or delivery to the fiduciary or a receipt or acquittance signed by
the fiduciary, to whom any payment or delivery of rights is made,
is a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the payments
bank for the payment or delivery so made.
Sec. 84. 1. Each payments bank doing business in this
State shall file with the Commissioner a report containing any
information or other facts the Commissioner deems necessary.
2. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing the
information to be reported and the amount of the fee that may be
imposed pursuant to this subsection.
3. Every payments bank shall pay to the Commissioner for
supervision and examination a fee based on the rate established
and, if applicable, adjusted pursuant to section 84.5 of this act.
Sec. 84.5. 1. The Commissioner shall establish by
regulation rates to be paid by payments banks for supervision and
examinations by the Commissioner or the Division of Financial
Institutions. The rates established pursuant to this section must be
established separately from the rates established for banks and
other financial institutions pursuant to NRS 658.101.
2. In establishing a rate pursuant to subsection 1, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(a) The complexity of the various examinations to which the
rate applies;
(b) The skill required to conduct the examinations;
(c) The expenses associated with conducting an examination
and preparing a report; and
(d) Any other factors the Commissioner deems relevant.
3. At least once each year, the Commissioner shall review and
analyze the proportional utilization of the resources of the
Division of Financial Institutions by payments banks as compared
to the annual budget approved by the Legislature for the Division
-
*AB500_R1*

– 26 –
of Financial Institutions. If after such review and analysis the
Commissioner deems it necessary, the Commissioner shall adjust
by regulation the rates established pursuant to subsection 1.
4. The Commissioner shall publish on the Internet website of
the Division of Financial Institutions by December 31 of each year
the amount of each fee for the following year that results from the
rates established and, if applicable, adjusted pursuant to this
section.
5. As used in this section, “financial institution” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 658.101.
Sec. 85. Each such payments bank shall cause to be supplied
to the Commissioner at any time, upon his or her demand, any
information which he or she may require as to the condition,
affairs or methods of the payments bank.
Sec. 86. 1. The Commissioner may conduct or cause to be
conducted such hearings, investigations or examinations of the
books and records, wherever they may be, relating to the affairs of
such organizations as he or she may deem expedient and in aid of
the proper administration of the provisions of this chapter.
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 92 of this act, all
examination reports and all information obtained by the
Commissioner in conducting hearings, investigations or
examinations under the provisions of this chapter, including all
related correspondence and memoranda, and information
obtained by the Commissioner from other state or federal bank
regulatory authorities with whom the Commissioner has entered
into agreements for the confidential sharing of such information,
and information obtained by the Commissioner relating to the
examination and supervision of any corporation which is an
affiliate of a payments bank is confidential and privileged
information and must not be made public or otherwise disclosed to
any person, firm, corporation, agency, association, governmental
body, court or other entity.
3. Any information submitted by a person to the
Commissioner for any purpose under this chapter shall not be
construed as waiving, destroying or otherwise affecting any
privilege such person may claim with respect to such information
under federal or state law as to any person or entity other than the
Commissioner.
4. In connection with the conduct of any hearing,
investigation or examination, the Commissioner or other person
designated by him or her to conduct it may:
(a) Compel the attendance of any person by subpoena.
(b) Administer oaths.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 27 –
(c) Examine any person under oath concerning the business
and conduct of affairs of any payments bank subject to the
provisions of this chapter, and require the production of any
books, papers, records, money and securities relevant to the
inquiry. Any willful false swearing is perjury and is punishable as
such.
5. The Commissioner shall conduct at least once every 2
years an examination of the books and records of each payments
bank licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 87. 1. For the purpose of discovering violations of this
chapter or securing information lawfully required under this
chapter, the Commissioner or his or her duly authorized
representatives may, at any time, investigate the business and
examine the books, accounts, papers and records used therein of
any:
(a) Payments bank;
(b) Other person engaged in an activity regulated pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter; and
(c) Person whom the Commissioner has reasonable cause to
believe is violating or is about to violate any provision of this
chapter, whether or not the person claims to be within the
authority or beyond the scope of this chapter.
2. For the purpose of examination, the Commissioner or his
or her authorized representatives must have and be given free
access to the offices and places of business, files, safes and vaults
of such persons.
3. The Commissioner may require the attendance of any
person and examine him or her under oath regarding:
(a) Any transaction or business regulated pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter; or
(b) The subject matter of any audit, examination, investigation
or hearing.
Sec. 88. 1. In case of the refusal of any person to attend or
testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena directed to
be served under the provision of section 86 of this act, the
Commissioner may report to the district court in and for the
county in which the examination, hearing or investigation is
pending by petition, setting forth that:
(a) Due notice has been given of the time and place of
attendance of the person or the production of the books and
papers;
(b) The person has been subpoenaed in the manner prescribed
in this chapter; and
(c) The person has failed and refused to attend or produce the
papers required by subpoena before the Commissioner in the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 28 –
examination, hearing or investigation named in the subpoena, or
has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the
course of such examination, hearing or investigation,
 and asking an order of the court compelling the person to
attend and testify or produce the books or papers before the
Commissioner.
2. The court, upon petition of the Commissioner, shall enter
an order directing the person to appear before the court at a time
and place to be fixed by the court in such order, the time to be not
more than 10 days from the date of the order, and then and there
show cause why he or she has not attended or testified or produced
the books or papers before the Commissioner. A certified copy of
the order must be served upon the person. If it appears to the court
that the subpoena was regularly issued by the Commissioner, the
court shall thereupon enter an order that the person appear before
the Commissioner at the time and place fixed in the order and
testify or produce the required books or papers. Upon failure to
obey the order, the person shall be dealt with as for contempt of
court.
Sec. 89. 1. The Commissioner may, at the time of
examining a payments bank, inspect the books, ledgers and
minutes of any corporation which is registered or required to be
registered under section 5 of the Bank Holding Company Act of
1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1844, or section 10 of the Home Owners’ Loan
Act of 1933, 12 U.S.C. § 1467a, as a holding company whenever,
in his or her discretion, the Commissioner considers it advisable to
ascertain facts which may relate to transactions between the
holding company and the affiliated payments bank. The provisions
of section 86 of this act apply to the examination of such
corporation.
2. Upon making findings to that end, the Commissioner may
order the discontinuance of borrowing or lending, selling or
buying of assets, extending credit or guaranteeing obligations of
the holding company which has been undertaken without the
written approval of the Commissioner.
3. A holding company which controls a payments bank shall
not impose any unreasonable supervisory fees upon the payments
bank.
Sec. 90. 1. Whenever in connection with an examination it
is necessary or expedient that the Commissioner or his or her
designee, or both, leave this State, there must be assessed against
the organization under examination a fee of not more than the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally for each person while outside the State in
-
*AB500_R1*

– 29 –
connection with an examination, together with all actual and
necessary expenses.
2. The fee charged must be remitted to the Commissioner.
The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing the
amount of the fee required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 91. In lieu of making any examination, the
Commissioner may accept any examination of any payments bank
made by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System,
any Federal Home Loan Bank or Federal Reserve Bank, or the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or may examine any such
institution in conjunction with the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System, a Federal Home Loan Bank or Federal
Reserve Bank, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
Sec. 92. 1. Before disclosing or furnishing any document,
report or information under this section, the Commissioner must
determine that such document, report or information will receive
protection from further disclosure comparable to the protections
provided by this chapter.
2. The Commissioner, his or her agents and employees may
furnish all or any part of an examination report, work paper,
supervisory agreement or directive, order or other information
obtained in the conduct of a hearing, investigation or examination
under the provisions of this chapter to:
(a) An agency of the Federal Government or of another state
empowered to examine or supervise a payments bank, a bank
holding company owning a payments bank or a subsidiary of such
holding company;
(b) An official empowered to investigate criminal charges
subject to legal process, valid search warrant or subpoena,
provided that the Commissioner may only furnish that part of any
document or report which is necessary and pertinent to the
investigation, and the Commissioner may do this only after
notifying the affected payments bank and any customer of the
payments bank who is named in such part of the document or
report ordered to be furnished unless the official requesting the
document or report first obtains a waiver of the notice requirement
from a court of competent jurisdiction for good cause;
(c) The examined payments bank or holding company thereof;
(d) A receiver or liquidator appointed pursuant to this chapter;
or
(e) The court in a proceeding initiated by the Commissioner
concerning the payments bank if the Commissioner first provides
such notice to the payments bank as will afford the payments bank
an opportunity to object or to seek a protective order.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 30 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, all
documents, reports and information furnished by the
Commissioner pursuant to this section remain the property of the
Division of Financial Institutions, and no person, agency or
authority to whom such documents, reports or information are
made available, or any officer, director or employee thereof, may
disclose any of the documents, reports or information contained
therein, except in published statistical material that does not
disclose the affairs of any natural person or corporation.
4. An examination report made by the Division of Financial
Institutions is designed for use in the supervision of a payments
bank. The report shall remain the property of the Commissioner
and will be furnished to the payments bank solely for its
confidential use. The payments bank may disclose the report or
relevant portions thereof to any of its directors, officers,
employees, agents or affiliates as necessary and appropriate in the
conduct of its affairs. Under no circumstances may the payments
bank or any of its directors, officers, employees, agents or
affiliates disclose or make public in any manner the report or any
portion thereof to any person or organization not connected with
the payments bank as officer, director, employee, attorney, auditor
or candidate for executive office with the payments bank or its
holding company. The payments bank may also, after execution of
an agreement not to disclose information in the report, disclose
the report or relevant portions thereof to a party proposing to
acquire or merge with the payments bank.
5. Except for an examination report as provided in subsection
4, a payments bank may disclose any document, report or
information provided by the payments bank to the Commissioner
and any document, report or information received by the payments
bank from the Commissioner to any of its directors, officers,
employees, agents or affiliates as necessary and appropriate in the
conduct of its affairs.
6. A payments bank, a bank holding company or owning a
payments bank or a subsidiary of such a holding company, does
not violate this section by complying with a duty to report to the
Securities and Exchange Commission, including, without
limitation, by disclosing any order of the Commissioner pursuant
to such a duty.
Sec. 93. 1. Each payments bank shall, at least once each
year, cause its books and accounts to be audited at its own expense
by a certified public accountant or firm of such accountants
selected by the payments bank and approved by the Commissioner.
2. The Commissioner may prescribe the scope of the audit.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 31 –
3. A certified copy of the audit, including the management
and internal control letters relating to the audit, must be furnished
to the Commissioner.
Sec. 94. Each payments bank shall pay the assessment levied
pursuant to NRS 658.055 and cooperate fully with the audits and
examinations performed pursuant thereto.
Sec. 95. The Commissioner may after notice and hearing
suspend or revoke the charter of any payments bank for:
1. Repeated failure to abide by the provisions of this chapter
or the regulations adopted thereunder.
2. Failure to pay a tax as required pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 363A or 363C of NRS.
Sec. 96. 1. If the Commissioner finds as the result of any
examination or from any report made to him or her or to any
payments bank doing business in this State or from any report
made to any of its investors that the payments bank is violating the
provisions of its articles of incorporation, charter, bylaws, or any
law of this State, or is conducting its business in an unsafe or
injurious manner, he or she may by an order addressed to such
payments bank direct a discontinuance of such violations or
unsafe or injurious practices and a conformity with all the
requirements of law.
2. If a payments bank does not comply with such order, the
Commissioner may order the corporate secretary to call a special
directors’ meeting to consider the matter of noncompliance.
3. The meeting must be held no later than 60 days after
issuance of the order to hold the meeting, unless otherwise
restrained by court order or by the board. The business of the
meeting must be limited to the matter of noncompliance and
remedies therefor and the notice of such meeting must set forth in
detail the Commissioner’s discontinuance order and order to call
a directors’ meeting.
4. Action taken at the meeting is binding upon the officers of
the payments bank.
Sec. 97. 1. A payments bank may reorganize, merge or
consolidate with another state or federal bank, national bank,
state bank or other insured depository institution, if the
reorganization, merger or consolidation is based upon a plan
which has been adopted by the board of directors and approved at
a regular or special stockholders’ meeting which has been called
to consider the action. The approval must rest on a favorable vote
of a majority of the voting power of the payments bank as
established by its articles.
2. Any such plan for reorganization, merger or consolidation
must be approved by the Commissioner. In submitting an
-
*AB500_R1*

– 32 –
application for approval of any such plan, each payments bank
proposing to reorganize, merge or consolidate must provide any
and all information and other facts which the Commissioner
requires for his or her review of the proposed transaction.
3. Unless its action is specifically authorized by or taken in
conformity with this chapter, a payments bank may not, directly or
indirectly:
(a) Reorganize, merge or consolidate.
(b) Assume liability to pay deposit accounts or other liabilities
of any financial institution or any other organization, person or
entity.
(c) Transfer assets to any financial institution or any other
organization, person or entity in consideration of the transferee’s
assumption of liability for any portion of the transferor’s deposit
accounts, deposits or other liability.
(d) Acquire the assets of any financial institution or any other
organization, person or entity.
4. Each application which is made under this section must be
accompanied by a fee payment of not more than $300. The
responsibility for payment of the fee must be shared equally by the
payments banks participating in each proposed plan.
5. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing the
amount of the fee required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 98. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
payments bank may go into voluntary liquidation pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 78.580 or 86.491.
2. If the voluntary liquidation of the payments bank results
from a vote or agreement of the stockholders or members of the
payments bank, a certified copy of all proceedings of the meeting
at which that action is taken, verified by the oath of the president
or a manager, must be transmitted to the Commissioner for the
Commissioner’s approval. If the Commissioner approves the
liquidation, the Commissioner shall issue to the payments bank,
under the Commissioner’s seal, a permit for that purpose. No
permit may be issued by the Commissioner until the Commissioner
is satisfied that provision has been made by the payments bank to
satisfy and pay off all depositors and all creditors of the payments
bank. If the Commissioner is not satisfied, the Commissioner shall
not issue a permit, but the Commissioner may take possession of
the payments bank, its assets and business, and liquidate the
payments bank in the manner provided by this chapter.
3. When the Commissioner approves the voluntary
liquidation of a payments bank pursuant to subsection 2, the
directors or managers of the payments bank shall cause to be
published, in a newspaper in the city, town or county in which the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 33 –
corporate office of the payments bank is located, a notice that the
payments bank is closing its affairs and going into liquidation,
and that its depositors and creditors are to present their claims for
payment.
4. When any payments bank is in the process of voluntary
liquidation, it is subject to examination by the Commissioner, and
the payments bank shall furnish such reports, from time to time,
as may be called for by the Commissioner.
5. All unclaimed deposits and dividends remaining in the
hands of the payments bank are subject to the provisions of this
chapter.
6. Any payments bank that is in the process of voluntary
liquidation may sell and transfer to any other state bank, national
bank or federal bank all or any portion of its assets of every kind
upon such terms as may be agreed upon and approved by the
Commissioner and by a majority vote of the payments bank’s
board of directors or of its managers. A certified copy of the
minutes of any meeting at which that action is taken, under the
oath of the president or a manager, and a copy of the contract of
sale and transfer must be filed with the Commissioner.
7. If a voluntary liquidation or the sale and transfer of the
assets of any payments bank is approved by the Commissioner, a
certified copy of that approval under seal of the Commissioner,
filed in the Office of the Secretary of State, authorizes the
cancellation of the articles of incorporation or organization of the
payments bank, subject to its continued existence, as provided by
law.
Sec. 99. The provisions of sections 100 to 116, inclusive, of
this act apply to a payments bank whose deposit accounts are
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
Sec. 100. 1. The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
created by the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1811,
may act without bond as receiver or liquidator of any payments
bank which:
(a) Has been closed because of inability to meet the demands
of its depositors; and
(b) Is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
and has been taken possession of by the Commissioner pursuant
to NRS 658.151.
2. The appropriate state authority having the right to appoint
a receiver or liquidator of a payments bank may, upon such
closing, tender to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation the
appointment as receiver or liquidator of such payments bank. If
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation accepts the
appointment, it shall have and possess all the powers and
-
*AB500_R1*

– 34 –
privileges provided by the laws of this State with respect to a
receiver or liquidator, respectively, of a payments bank, its
depositors and other creditors, and is subject to all the duties of
such receiver or liquidator, except insofar as such powers,
privileges or duties are in conflict with the provisions of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act.
Sec. 101. Upon the acceptance of the appointment as
receiver or liquidator by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, the possession of and title to all the assets, business
and property of such payments bank of every kind and nature
shall pass to and vest in the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation without the execution of any instruments of
conveyance, assignment, transfer or endorsement.
Sec. 102. Among its other powers, the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation, in the performance of its powers and
duties as receiver or liquidator, may, upon the order of a court of
record of competent jurisdiction, enforce the individual liability of
the stockholders or members and directors or managers of any
such payments bank.
Sec. 103. 1. When any state payments bank has been closed
as provided in section 100 of this act, and the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation pays, or makes available for payment, the
insured deposit liabilities of such closed payments bank, must be
subrogated to all rights against such closed bank of the owners of
such deposits in the same manner and to the same extent as the
subrogation of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation is
provided for in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act in the case of
the closing of a national bank.
2. The rights of depositors and other creditors of such closed
payments bank will be determined in accordance with the
applicable provisions of the laws of this State.
Sec. 104. 1. Any payments bank which is, or may hereafter
be, closed on account of inability to meet the demands of its
depositors, by action of the Commissioner, by action of a court, by
action of its directors or due to its insolvency or suspension, the
Commissioner, or the receiver or liquidator of the payments bank
with the permission of the Commissioner, may borrow from the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and furnish any part or
all of the assets of the payments bank to the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation as security for a loan from it, but where
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation is acting as the
receiver or liquidator, the order of a court of record of competent
jurisdiction must be first obtained approving the loan.
2. The Commissioner, or the receiver or liquidator of any
payments bank with the permission of the Commissioner, upon the
-
*AB500_R1*

– 35 –
order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction, may sell to
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation any part or all of the
assets of the payments bank.
3. The provisions of this section do not limit the power of any
payments bank, the Commissioner, receivers or liquidators to
pledge or sell assets in accordance with any other existing law.
Sec. 105. 1. The Commissioner shall furnish to the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation, or to any official or examiner
thereof, a copy of all examinations made of any payments bank
and of all reports made by the payments bank. The Commissioner
shall give access to and disclose to the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, or to any official or examiner thereof, all
information possessed by the office of the Division of Financial
Institutions with reference to the conditions or affairs of any
payments bank.
2. Nothing in this section limits:
(a) The duty of any payments bank in this State from
complying with the provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Act, its amendments or substitutions, or the requirements of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation relative to examinations
and reports; or
(b) The powers of the Commissioner with reference to
examinations and reports pursuant to the provisions of chapters
657 to 671, inclusive, of NRS.
Sec. 106. All books, papers and records of a payments bank
which has been finally liquidated must be deposited by the receiver
in the Office of the Commissioner.
Sec. 107. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, after the expiration of 10 years from the filing by the
Commissioner of a final report of liquidation of any insolvent
payments bank, the Commissioner, with the consent of the State
Board of Finance, may destroy the records of any insolvent
payments bank held in the Office of the Commissioner in
connection with the liquidation of the payments bank.
2. If there are any unpaid dividends of the insolvent payments
bank, the Commissioner shall preserve the deposit ledger or other
evidence of indebtedness of the payments bank which refers to the
unpaid dividends until the dividends have been paid.
3. The Commissioner may not destroy any of the formal
records of liquidation or any of the records made in the
Commissioner’s office with reference to the liquidation of any
insolvent payments bank.
Sec. 108. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
any payments bank that has been or is appointed trustee in any
indenture, deed of trust or other instrument of like character,
-
*AB500_R1*

– 36 –
executed to secure the payment of any bonds, notes or other
evidences of indebtedness, is taken over for liquidation by the
Commissioner, by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or
by any other legally constituted authority, the powers and duties of
the payments bank as trustee cease upon the entry of an order of
the district court appointing a successor trustee pursuant to a
petition as provided for in sections 109 to 114, inclusive, of this
act.
2. If an indenture, deed of trust or other instrument of like
character that appoints a payments bank as trustee pursuant to
subsection 1 includes a provision which provides for the
appointment of a successor trustee if the payments bank is taken
over for liquidation, the powers and duties of the payments bank
as trustee cease upon being taken over by the Commissioner, the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other legally
constituted authority and the successor trustee named, or whose
selection is provided for, in the instrument immediately assumes
the duties as trustee without appointment by the district court
pursuant to sections 109 to 114, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 109. 1. In all cases to which subsection 1 of section
108 of this act is applicable, the district court for the county in
which such indenture, deed of trust or other instrument of like
character is recorded shall, upon the verified petition of any
person interested in any such trust, either as trustee, beneficiary or
otherwise, which interest must be set out in the petition, issue its
order directing service on all interested parties, personally or by
the publication in a newspaper published in the county, or in some
adjoining county if no newspaper is published in the county where
the application is made, of a notice directed to all persons
concerned, commanding and requiring all persons having any
interest in the trust, to appear in court on a day designated in the
order and notice, not less than 30 days after the date of the order
and notice, to show cause why a new trustee should not be
appointed.
2. Such notice must be published in the manner required by
the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure for service of summons by
publication, and shall set forth the names of the parties to the
indenture, deed of trust or other such instrument, the date thereof,
and the place or places where such instrument is recorded.
Sec. 110. If, upon the day fixed in the order and notice, no
person appears and objects to the appointment of a substitute
trustee, the district court shall, upon such terms as it deems
advisable to serve the best interest of all interested parties, appoint
some competent person, or corporation authorized to act as a
trustee, as a substitute trustee. Such appointed trustee is vested
-
*AB500_R1*

– 37 –
with and shall exercise all the powers conferred upon the trustee
named in the instrument.
Sec. 111. If, upon the day fixed in the order and notice,
objection is made to the appointment of a new trustee, the court
shall hear and determine the matter. An appeal may be taken from
the decision of the court by any party who made an appearance in
the proceeding.
Sec. 112. The final order of appointment of any such new
trustee upon its entry must be recorded in the office of the county
recorder in the county or counties in which the instrument under
which such appointment has been made is recorded, and a minute
of the same must be entered by the county recorder on the margin
of the record where the original instrument is recorded.
Sec. 113. The petition and the order appointing such new
trustee may include, relate to and apply to any number of
indentures, deeds of trust or other instruments, wherein the same
trustee is named.
Sec. 114. Sections 100 to 113, inclusive, of this act, are in
addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy provided
by law.
Sec. 115. If the Commissioner, the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or any liquidating agent appointed
pursuant to the provisions of sections 100 to 105, inclusive, of this
act, exercises the power of sale set up in any mortgage, deed of
trust or other written instrument for the security of the payment of
money in which any payments bank then in liquidation was named
trustee, the exercise of the power of sale and the acts of resigning
the trust, of the Commissioner, the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or the appointed liquidating agent have the same
effect as if done by the payments bank named as trustee in the
mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument.
Sec. 116. When the Commissioner or the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation has taken possession of any payments
bank, the payments bank may, with the consent of the
Commissioner, resume business upon such terms and conditions
as may be approved by the Commissioner and the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation.
Sec. 117. 1. When any payments bank is authorized to
dissolve and has taken the necessary steps to effect dissolution in
accordance with the laws of this State or the laws of the United
States, but before actual dissolution, a majority of the directors or
managers of the payments bank, upon authority in writing of the
owners of two-thirds of its stock or two-thirds of the members’
interests and with the approval of the Commissioner, may execute
articles of incorporation or organization as provided in this
-
*AB500_R1*

– 38 –
chapter for the organization of a new payments bank. The articles
must further set forth the authority derived from the stockholders
or members of the payments bank.
2. Upon the filing of articles of incorporation or organization
in the same manner as provided for the organization of new
payments banks, the reorganized payments bank is a payments
bank under the laws of this State. Upon reorganization, all assets,
real and personal, of the dissolved payments bank, by operation of
law, vest in and become the property of the reorganized payments
bank, subject to all liabilities of the payments bank existing before
the reorganization.
Sec. 118. As used in sections 118 to 125, inclusive, of this
act, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms
defined in sections 119 to 123, inclusive, of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 119. “Designated reporter” means a person designated
by a payments bank to receive reports of known or suspected
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person pursuant to
section 125 of this act.
Sec. 120. “Exploitation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.5092.
Sec. 121. “Older person” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.5092.
Sec. 122. “Reasonable cause to believe” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.50925.
Sec. 123. “Vulnerable person” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 200.5092.
Sec. 124. 1. Each payments bank shall provide training
concerning the identification and reporting of the suspected
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person to each
director, officer and employee of the payments bank who:
(a) May, as part of his or her regular duties for the payments
bank, come into direct contact with an older person or vulnerable
person; or
(b) May review or approve the financial documents, records or
transactions of an older person or vulnerable person in
connection with providing financial services to the older person or
vulnerable person.
2. The training required pursuant to subsection 1 must be
provided as soon as reasonably practicable, but not later than 6
months after the director, officer or employee is employed by the
payments bank or assumes the position.
3. The training required pursuant to subsection 1 must
include, without limitation:
-
*AB500_R1*

– 39 –
(a) An explanation of the conduct which constitutes
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person;
(b) The manner in which exploitation of an older person or
vulnerable person may be recognized;
(c) Information concerning the manner in which reports of
exploitation are investigated; and
(d) Instruction concerning when and how to report known or
suspected exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person.
4. A director, officer or employee who has observed or has
knowledge of an incident that is directly related to a transaction or
matter which is within his or her scope of practice and which
reasonably appears to be exploitation of an older person or
vulnerable person shall report the known or suspected exploitation
to the designated reporter.
Sec. 125. 1. Each payments bank shall designate a person
or persons to whom a director, officer or employee of the payments
bank must report known or suspected exploitation of an older
person or vulnerable person.
2. If a director, officer or employee reports known or
suspected exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person to a
designated reporter and, based on such a report or based on his or
her own observations or knowledge, the designated reporter knows
or has reasonable cause to believe that an older person or
vulnerable person has been exploited, the designated reporter
shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, report the
known or suspected exploitation of the older person or vulnerable
person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office;
(3) The county’s office for protective services, if one exists
in the county where the suspected action occurred; or
(4) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging
and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(b) Make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable.
3. If the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause
to believe that the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable
person involves an act or omission of the Aging and Disability
Services Division, another division of the Department of Health
and Human Services or a law enforcement agency, the designated
reporter shall make the report to an agency other than the one
alleged to have committed the act or omission.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 40 –
4. In accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
239A.070, in making a report pursuant to this section, a
designated reporter may:
(a) Disclose any facts or information that form the basis of the
determination that the designated reporter knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, including, without limitation, the
identity of any person believed to be involved in the exploitation of
the older person or vulnerable person; and
(b) Provide any financial records or other documentation
relating to the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable
person.
5. A director, officer, employee and the designated reporter
are entitled to the immunity from liability set forth in NRS
200.5096 for making a report in good faith.
Sec. 126. Any person who knowingly makes, utters,
circulates or transmits to another, or others, any statement untrue
in fact, derogatory to the financial condition of any such payments
bank doing business in this State, with intent to injure the
payments bank, or who counsels, aids, procures or induces
another to originate, make, utter, transmit or circulate any such
statement or rumor, with like intent, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 127. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, a
payments bank which violates any provision of this chapter or
fraudulently misrepresents the terms of any contract or of any
securities, and thereby secures a sale therefor, shall be punished
by an administrative fine of not more than $10,000 and forfeiture
and revocation of all licenses issued to it under the provisions of
this chapter.
Sec. 128. NRS 657.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
657.037 “Depository institution” means any bank, savings and
loan association, savings bank, thrift company, credit union ,
payments bank or other institution, whether chartered by this State,
another state or the Federal Government, which:
1. Holds or receives deposits, savings or share accounts;
2. Issues certificates of deposit; or
3. Provides to its customers other depository accounts which
are subject to withdrawal by checks, drafts or other instruments or
by electronic means to effect payment to a third party.
Sec. 129. NRS 658.098 is hereby amended to read as follows:
658.098 1. On a quarterly or other regular basis, the
Commissioner shall collect an assessment pursuant to this section
from each:
(a) Check-cashing service or deferred deposit loan service that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 604A of NRS;
-
*AB500_R1*

– 41 –
(b) Collection agency that is supervised pursuant to chapter 649
of NRS;
(c) Bank that is supervised pursuant to chapters 657 to 668,
inclusive, of NRS;
(d) Trust company or family trust company that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 669 or 669A of NRS;
(e) Person engaged in the business of money transmission that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 671 of NRS;
(f) Savings and loan association or savings bank that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 673 of NRS;
(g) Person engaged in the business of lending that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 675 of NRS;
(h) Thrift company that is supervised pursuant to chapter 677 of
NRS;
(i) Credit union that is supervised pursuant to chapter 672 of
NRS;
(j) Consumer litigation funding company that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 604C of NRS; [and]
(k) Student loan servicer that is supervised pursuant to chapter
670B of NRS [.] ; and
(l) Payments bank that is supervised pursuant to the chapter
consisting of sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of this act.
2. The Commissioner shall determine the total amount of all
assessments to be collected from the entities identified in subsection
1, but that amount must not exceed the amount necessary to recover
the cost of legal services provided by the Attorney General to the
Commissioner and to the Division of Financial Institutions. The
total amount of all assessments collected must be reduced by any
amounts collected by the Commissioner from an entity for the
recovery of the costs of legal services provided by the Attorney
General in a specific case.
3. The Commissioner shall collect from each entity identified
in subsection 1 an assessment that is based on:
(a) A portion of the total amount of all assessments as
determined pursuant to subsection 2, such that the assessment
collected from an entity identified in subsection 1 shall bear the
same relation to the total amount of all assessments as the total
assets of that entity bear to the total of all assets of all entities
identified in subsection 1; or
(b) Any other reasonable basis adopted by the Commissioner.
4. The assessment required by this section is in addition to any
other assessment, fee or cost required by law to be paid by an entity
identified in subsection 1.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 42 –
5. Money collected by the Commissioner pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the State Treasury pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 658.091.
Sec. 129.5. NRS 658.101 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
658.101 1. The Commissioner shall establish by regulation
rates to be paid by banks and other financial institutions for
supervision and examinations by the Commissioner or the Division
of Financial Institutions.
2. In establishing a rate pursuant to subsection 1, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(a) The complexity of the various examinations to which the rate
applies;
(b) The skill required to conduct the examinations;
(c) The expenses associated with conducting the examination
and preparing a report; and
(d) Any other factors the Commissioner deems relevant.
3. At least once each year, the Commissioner shall review and
analyze the proportional utilization of the resources of the Division
of Financial Institutions by banks and other financial institutions as
compared to the annual budget approved by the Legislature for the
Division of Financial Institutions. If after such review and analysis
the Commissioner deems it necessary, the Commissioner shall
adjust by regulation the rates established pursuant to subsection 1.
4. The Commissioner shall publish on the Internet website of
the Division of Financial Institutions by December 31 of each year
the amount of each fee for the following year that results from the
rates established and, if applicable, adjusted pursuant to this section.
5. As used in this section, “financial institution” means a
depository institution or any other institution or business regulated
by the Division of Financial Institutions pursuant to titles 52, 54 and
55 of NRS [.] , other than a payments bank regulated by the
Division of Financial Institutions pursuant to the chapter
consisting of sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of this act. The term
includes, without limitation, a holding company, affiliate or
subsidiary of such an institution.
Sec. 130. NRS 659.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
659.125 1. A business entity may not be organized under the
laws of this State with the words “bank” or “banking” as part of its
name except corporations or limited-liability companies subject to
regulation pursuant to chapters 657 to 668, inclusive, 673 or 677 of
NRS, and the chapter consisting of sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of
this act or corporations under the regulation of the Commissioner of
Insurance. A corporate or company name must not be amended to
-
*AB500_R1*

– 43 –
include the words “bank” or “banking” unless the corporation or
company is under such regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a natural
person, association, firm or corporation domiciled within this State,
except a national bank or a banking corporation subject to regulation
pursuant to chapters 657 to 668, inclusive, 673 or 677 of NRS, and
the chapter consisting of sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of this act or
under the regulation of the Commissioner of Insurance, may not
advertise or put forth any sign as bank, banking or banker or use the
word “bank,” “banking” or “banker” as part of its name and title.
3. A thrift company subject to the provisions of chapter 677 of
NRS may use the words “savings bank” as part of its name if its
deposits are federally insured.
4. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this
section shall be fined not more than $500 for each offense.
Sec. 131. NRS 671.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
671.020 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 671.155, this
chapter does not apply to any:
1. Federally insured depository financial institution, privately
insured depository financial institution, bank holding company or
any subsidiary thereof, office of an international banking
corporation, foreign bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant
to 12 U.S.C. § 3102, as amended, corporation organization pursuant
to 12 U.S.C. §§ 1861 to 1867, inclusive, as amended, or corporation
organized pursuant to 12 U.S.C. §§ 611 to 633, inclusive, as
amended, under the laws of a state or of the United States.
2. Operator of a payment system to the extent that it provides
processing, clearing or settlement services between or among
persons exempted pursuant to this section or licensees in connection
with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions,
stored value transactions, automated clearinghouse transfers or
similar transfers of money.
3. Person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and
process a payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services,
other than money transmission, provided to the payor by the payee,
so long as:
(a) A written agreement exists between the payee and the agent
directing the agent to collect and process payments from payors on
behalf of the payee;
(b) The payee holds the agent out to the public as accepting
payments for goods or services on behalf of the payee; and
(c) Payment for the goods and services is treated as received by
the payee upon receipt by the agent so that the obligation of the
payor is extinguished and there is no risk of loss to the payor if the
agent fails to remit the money to the payee.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 44 –
4. Person that acts as an intermediary by processing payments
between an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money
transmission obligation to a sender and the designated recipient of
the sender, so long as the entity:
(a) Is a licensee or exempt from licensure pursuant to this
chapter;
(b) Provides a receipt, electronic record or other written
confirmation to the sender identifying the entity as the provider of
money transmission in the transaction; and
(c) Bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding money
transmission obligation to the sender, including, without limitation,
the obligation to make the sender whole in connection with any
failure to transmit the money to the designated recipient of the
sender.
5. Department, agency, instrumentality or agent of the United
States.
6. State, county, city or any other governmental agency,
subdivision, instrumentality or agent of a state.
7. Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or
by an agent of the United States Postal Service.
8. Trust company that is licensed or otherwise authorized to
engage in the business of a trust company in this State pursuant to
chapter 669 of NRS.
9. Electronic money transfer of governmental benefits for a
federal, state, county or governmental agency by a contractor on
behalf of the United States or a department, agency or
instrumentality thereof or on behalf of a state or governmental
subdivision, agency or instrumentality thereof.
10. Board of trade designated as a contract market under the
Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. §§ 1 et seq., as amended, or a
person that, in the ordinary course of business, provides clearance
and settlement services for a board of trade to the extent of its
operation as or for the board of trade.
11. Registered futures commission merchant under the federal
commodities laws to the extent of its operation as such a merchant.
12. Person registered as a securities broker-dealer under federal
or state securities laws to the extent of the operations of the person
as such a securities broker-dealer.
13. Natural person employed by a licensee, authorized delegate
or any person exempt from licensure pursuant to this section when
acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of
the licensee, authorized delegate or exempt person as an employee
and not as an independent contractor.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 45 –
14. Person expressly appointed as a third-party service
provider to or agent of an entity exempt pursuant to subsection 1 to
the extent that:
(a) The third-party service provider or agent is engaging in
money transmission on behalf of and pursuant to a written
agreement with the exempt entity that sets forth the specific
functions that the third-party service provider or agent is to perform;
and
(b) The exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and legal
responsibility for satisfying the outstanding money transmission
obligations owed to purchasers and holders of the outstanding
money transmission obligations upon receipt by the third-party
service provider of the money or monetary value of the purchaser or
holder.
15. Employer who performs payroll services on his or her own
behalf or on behalf of an affiliate of an employer.
16. Professional employer organization, as defined in NRS
611.400, who performs payroll services.
17. Provider who is licensed pursuant to chapter 604D of NRS.
18. Payments bank licensed pursuant to the chapter
consisting of sections 2 to 127, inclusive, of this act.
19. Person exempt by regulation or order of the Commissioner
pursuant to NRS 671.0205.
Sec. 132. NRS 52.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
52.450 As used in NRS 52.450 to 52.480, inclusive, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Banking or financial institution” means any bank, savings
and loan association, savings bank, thrift company , [or] credit union
or payments bank licensed to do business as such in this State or
any other state.
2. “Custodian of the records of a banking or financial
institution” means an employee or agent of a banking or financial
institution who has the care, custody and control of the records of
the banking or financial institution.
3. “Records of a banking or financial institution” means
memoranda, reports, records or compilations of data in any form
which are kept in the course of an activity which is regularly
conducted by a banking or financial institution.
Sec. 133. NRS 78.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.020 1. Trust companies, insurance companies, mutual fire
insurance companies, surety companies, express companies and
railroad companies may be formed under this chapter, but such a
corporation may not:
-
*AB500_R1*

– 46 –
(a) Transact any such business within this State until it has first
complied with all laws concerning or affecting the right to engage in
such business.
(b) Infringe the laws of any other state or country in which it
may intend to engage in business, by so incorporating under this
chapter.
2. No savings and loan association, savings bank, thrift
company , payments bank or corporation organized for the purpose
of conducting a banking business may be organized under this
chapter.
Sec. 134. NRS 78.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.045 1. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing
any articles of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of
articles of incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the word “bank” or “trust,” unless:
(a) It appears from the articles or the certificate of amendment
that the corporation proposes to carry on business as a banking or
trust company, exclusively or in connection with its business as a
bank, savings and loan association, savings bank , [or] thrift
company [;] or payments bank; and
(b) The articles or certificate of amendment is first approved by
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
2. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter if it appears from the articles or the certificate of
amendment that the business to be carried on by the corporation is
subject to supervision by the Commissioner of Insurance or by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions, unless the articles or
certificate of amendment is approved by the Commissioner who will
supervise the business of the corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,”
“engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or
“licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the corporation are licensed
to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the corporation is exempt from the
prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 47 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “architect,” “architecture,”
“registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “registered interior
designer,” “registered interior design,” “residential designer,”
“registered residential designer,” “licensed residential designer” or
“residential design” unless the State Board of Architecture, Interior
Design and Residential Design certifies that:
(a) The principals of the corporation are holders of a certificate
of registration to practice architecture or residential design or to
practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to
the laws of this State; or
(b) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this
State which provides that the name of the corporation contains the
word “accountant,” “accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or
“auditing” unless the Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies
that the corporation:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the corporation is not
engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to practice
accounting in this State.
6. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed or existing pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the words “common-interest community,” “community
association,” “master association,” “unit-owners’ association” or
“homeowners’ association” or if it appears in the articles of
incorporation or certificate of amendment that the purpose of the
corporation is to operate as a unit-owners’ association pursuant to
chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless the Administrator of the Real
Estate Division of the Department of Business and Industry certifies
that the corporation has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
-
*AB500_R1*

– 48 –
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
7. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 do not apply to any
corporation, whose securities are publicly traded and regulated by
the Securities Exchange Act, which does not engage in the practice
of professional engineering, architecture or residential design or
interior design, as applicable.
8. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions and the
Commissioner of Insurance may approve or disapprove the articles
or amendments referred to them pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 135. NRS 111.711 is hereby amended to read as follows:
111.711 “Financial institution” means an organization
authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to
financial institutions and includes a bank, thrift company, trust
company, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and
loan company or association , [and] credit union [.] and payments
bank.
Sec. 136. NRS 162A.520 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
162A.520 1. Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to banks and other financial institutions authorizes the
agent to:
(a) Continue, modify and terminate an account or other banking
arrangement made by or on behalf of the principal;
(b) Establish, modify and terminate an account or other banking
arrangement with a bank, trust company, savings and loan
association, savings bank, credit union, thrift company, payments
bank, brokerage firm or other financial institution selected by the
agent;
(c) Contract for services available from a financial institution,
including renting a safe deposit box or space in a vault;
(d) Withdraw, by check, order, electronic funds transfer or
otherwise, money or property of the principal deposited with or left
in the custody of a financial institution;
(e) Receive statements of account, vouchers, notices and similar
documents from a financial institution and act with respect to them;
(f) Enter a safe deposit box or vault and withdraw or add to the
contents;
(g) Borrow money and pledge as security personal property of
the principal necessary to borrow money or pay, renew or extend the
time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by
the principal;
-
*AB500_R1*

– 49 –
(h) Make, assign, draw, endorse, discount, guarantee and
negotiate promissory notes, checks, drafts and other negotiable or
nonnegotiable paper of the principal or payable to the principal or
the principal’s order, transfer money, receive the cash or other
proceeds of those transactions, and accept a draft drawn by a person
upon the principal and pay it when due;
(i) Receive for the principal and act upon a sight draft,
warehouse receipt or other document of title whether tangible or
electronic, or other negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument;
(j) Apply for, receive and use letters of credit, credit and debit
cards, electronic transaction authorizations and traveler’s checks
from a financial institution and give an indemnity or other
agreement in connection with letters of credit; and
(k) Consent to an extension of the time of payment with respect
to commercial paper or a financial transaction with a financial
institution.
2. An agent who is not the spouse of the principal must not be
listed on any account as a cosigner with right of survivorship, but
must be listed on the account solely as power of attorney.
Sec. 137. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
-
*AB500_R1*

– 50 –
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
-
*AB500_R1*

– 51 –
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 86 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
-
*AB500_R1*

– 52 –
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 138. NRS 239A.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
239A.030 “Financial institution” means any banking
corporation, trust company, savings and loan association, savings
bank, thrift company , [or] credit union or payments bank subject to
regulation under the laws of this state.
Sec. 138.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Financial Institutions of the
Department of Business and Industry for personnel, operating,
equipment and information services costs associated with carrying
out the provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,035,862
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,778,095
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
-
*AB500_R1*

– 53 –
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 138.7. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall,
on or before December 31, 2026, prepare and submit a written
report describing the activities of the Division of Financial
Institutions of the Department of Business and Industry relating to
the licensure of payments banks and the implementation of the
provisions of this act to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature.
Sec. 139. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 138, inclusive, and 138.7 of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Section 138.3 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB500_R1*